Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5820.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1531e. (1) In addition to the requirements under sections 1538a and 1531i, as applicable, and subject to subsection (2), the department shall not, beginning September 30, 2027, approve a teacher preparation program or an alternative teaching program and shall revoke, by September 30, 2027, shall revoke the approval of a teacher preparation program or an alternative teaching program unless the teacher preparation program or alternative teaching program offers instruction regarding all of the following: (a) The characteristics of dyslexia and underlying factors that place pupils at risk for difficulties in learning to decode accurately and efficiently. (b) The secondary consequences of dyslexia, such as problems in reading comprehension and a reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge and that can lead to social, emotional, and behavioral difficulties. (c) Instructional adjustments for pupils with dyslexia and instructional adjustments for addressing underlying factors that place pupils at risk for difficulties in learning to decode accurately and efficiently. (d) Methods for developing schoolwide and classroom infrastructure that meet the collective and individual needs of pupils using a multi-tiered system of support (MTSS). (2) (e) For Beginning July 1, 2026, a teacher preparation program or an alternative teaching program that prepares individuals for certification or endorsements that involve reading instruction, language arts, or special education, as appropriate, or for school psychologist licensure, in addition to the requirements in subdivisions (a) to (d), both subsection (1), must offer instruction regarding both of the following: (a) (i) Evidence-based instructional methods and features of evidence-based interventions that are grounded in the science of reading and principles of structured literacy that are designed for pupils with characteristics of dyslexia and pupils at risk for difficulties in learning to decode accurately and efficiently. (b) (ii) Evidence-based instructional methods and features of evidence-based interventions that are grounded in the science of reading and principles of structured literacy that are designed to effectively meet the needs of most pupils. (3) (2) If a teacher preparation program or alternative teaching program does not prepare individuals for certification or endorsements that involve reading instruction, language arts, or special education, or for school psychologist licensure, as described in subsection (2), the department may issue a waiver for 1 or more of the requirements in subsection (1)(a) to (d). (1). A waiver issued by the department under this subsection must be reviewed at least every 2 years to ensure the waiver is still appropriate and aligned with the department's goals for teacher preparation. (4) (3) As used in this section, "dyslexia", "evidence-based", "multi-tiered system of support (MTSS)", "science of reading", and "structured literacy" mean those terms as defined in section 1280f.